Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB323.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 61.315 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Police officer" means every paid police officer, sheriff, or deputy sheriff,
corrections employee with the power of a peace officer pursuant to KRS
196.037, any metropolitan or urban-county correctional officer with the power
of a peace officer pursuant to KRS 446.010, any jailer or deputy jailer, any
auxiliary police officer appointed pursuant to KRS 95.445, any police officer
of a public institution of postsecondary education appointed pursuant to KRS
164.950, any school resource officer as defined in KRS 158.441, or any
citation or safety officer appointed pursuant to KRS 83A.087 and 83A.088,
elected to office, or employed by any county, airport board created pursuant to
KRS Chapter 183, city, local board of education, or by the state;
(b) "Firefighter" means every paid firefighter or volunteer firefighter who is
employed by or volunteers his or her services to the state, airport board
created pursuant to KRS Chapter 183, any county, city, fire district, or any
other organized fire department recognized, pursuant to KRS 95A.262, as a
fire department operated and maintained on a nonprofit basis in the interest of
the health and safety of the inhabitants of the Commonwealth and shall
include qualified civilian firefighters employed at Kentucky-based military
installations; and
(c) "Emergency medical services personnel" means any paid or volunteer
emergency medical services personnel who is certified or licensed pursuant to
KRS Chapter 311A and who is employed directly by, or volunteering directly
for, any:
1. County;
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 2/5/2025 12:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1512
2. City;
3. Fire protection district created under KRS 75.010 to 75.260; or
4. Emergency ambulance service district created under KRS 108.080 to
108.180;
to provide emergency medical services.
(2) The spouse of any police officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff, corrections employee with
the power of a peace officer pursuant to KRS 196.037, any metropolitan or urban-
county correctional officer with the power of a peace officer pursuant to KRS
446.010, any jailer or deputy jailer, any auxiliary police officer appointed pursuant
to KRS 95.445, any police officer of a public institution of postsecondary education
appointed pursuant to KRS 164.950, any school resource officer as defined in KRS
158.441, or any citation or safety officer appointed pursuant to KRS 83A.087 and
83A.088, firefighter, or member of the Kentucky National Guard on state active
duty pursuant to KRS 38.030, or a member of a state National Guard or a Reserve
component on federal active duty under Title 10 or 32 of the United States Code
who names Kentucky as home of record for military purposes, whose death occurs
on or after July 1, 2002, as a direct result of an act in the line of duty shall receive a
lump-sum payment of eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) if there are no surviving
children, which sum shall be paid by the State Treasurer from the general fund of
the State Treasury. The spouse of any emergency medical services personnel whose
death occurs on or after November 1, 2015, as a direct result of an act in the line of
duty shall receive a lump-sum payment of eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) if there
are no surviving children, which sum shall be paid by the State Treasurer from the
general fund of the State Treasury. If there are surviving children and a surviving
spouse, the payment shall be apportioned equally among the surviving children and
the spouse. If there is no surviving spouse, the payment shall be made to the
surviving children, eighteen (18) or more years of age. For surviving children less
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 2/5/2025 12:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1512
than eighteen (18) years of age, the State Treasurer shall:
(a) Pay thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) to the surviving children; and
(b) Hold forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) in trust divided into equal accounts
at appropriate interest rates for each surviving child until the child reaches the
age of eighteen (18) years.
If a child dies before reaching the age of eighteen (18) years, his or her account
shall be paid to his or her estate. If there are no surviving children, the payment
shall be made to any parents of the deceased.
(3) The Kentucky Fire Commission shall be authorized to promulgate administrative
regulations establishing criteria and procedures applicable to the administration of
this section as it pertains to both paid and volunteer firefighters, including but not
limited to defining when a firefighter has died in line of duty. Administrative
hearings promulgated by administrative regulation under authority of this
subsection shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(4) The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations
establishing criteria and procedures applicable to the administration of this section
as it pertains to police officers, any metropolitan or urban-county correctional
officers with the power of a peace officer pursuant to KRS 446.010, any school
resource officer as defined in KRS 158.441, or any jailers or deputy jailers,
including but not limited to defining when one has died in line of duty.
Administrative hearings promulgated by administrative regulation under authority
of this subsection shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(5) The Department of Corrections shall promulgate administrative regulations
establishing the criteria and procedures applicable to the administration of this
section as it pertains to correctional employees, including but not limited to
defining which employees qualify for coverage and which circumstances constitute
death in the line of duty.
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 2/5/2025 12:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1512
(6) The Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services shall promulgate
administrative regulations establishing the criteria and procedures applicable to the
administration of this section as it pertains to emergency medical services
personnel, including but not limited to which employees or volunteers qualify for
coverage and which circumstances constitute death in the line of duty.
(7) The Department of Military Affairs shall promulgate administrative regulations
establishing the criteria and procedures applicable to the administration of this
section as it pertains to National Guard or Reserve component members, including
but not limited to defining which National Guard or Reserve component members
qualify for coverage and which circumstances constitute death in the line of duty.
(8) The estate of anyone whose spouse or surviving children would be eligible for
benefits under subsection (2) of this section, and the estate of any regular member
of the United States Armed Forces who names Kentucky as home of record for
military purposes whose death occurs as a direct result of an act in the line of duty,
shall be exempt from all probate fees, including but not limited to those established
by the Supreme Court of Kentucky pursuant to KRS 23A.200 and 24A.170, or
imposed under KRS 24A.185, 64.012, and 172.180.
(9) The benefits payable under this section shall be in addition to any benefits now or
hereafter prescribed under any police, sheriff, firefighter's, volunteer firefighter's,
emergency medical services personnel, or National Guard or Reserve retirement or
benefit fund established by the federal government or by any state, county, or any
municipality.
(10) Any funds appropriated for the purpose of paying the death benefits described in
subsection (2) of this section shall be allotted to a self-insuring account. These
funds shall not be used for the purpose of purchasing insurance.
(11) (a) For the purposes of this section, if a firefighter dies as a result of cancer, the
death shall be a direct result of an act in the line of duty if the firefighter:
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 2/5/2025 12:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1512
1. Was a firefighter for at least five (5) consecutive years;
2. Developed one (1) or more of the cancers listed in paragraph (b) of this
subsection which caused the firefighter's death within ten (10) years of
separation from service as a firefighter;
3. Did not use tobacco products for a period of ten (10) years prior to the
diagnosis of cancer;
4. Was under the age of sixty-five (65) at the time of death;
5. Was not diagnosed with any cancer prior to employment as a firefighter;
and
6. Was exposed while in the course of firefighting to a known carcinogen
as defined by the International Agency for Research on Cancer or the
National Toxicology Program, and the carcinogen is reasonably
associated with one (1) or more of the cancers listed in paragraph (b) of
this subsection.
(b) This section shall apply to the following cancers:
1. Bladder cancer;
2. Brain cancer;
3. Colon cancer;
4. Non-Hodgkin's lymphoma;
5. Kidney cancer;
6. Liver cancer;
7. Lymphatic or hematopoietic[haematopoietic] cancer;
8. Prostate cancer;
9. Testicular cancer;
10. Skin cancer;
11. Cervical cancer;[ and]
12. Breast cancer;
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 2/5/2025 12:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1512
13. Mesothelioma;
14. Esophageal cancer;
15. Lung cancer;
16. Rectal cancer;
17. Thyroid cancer;
18. Intestinal cancer;
19. Multiple myeloma cancer;
20. Buccal cancer; and
21. Pharyngeal cancer.
(c) 1. The provisions of this subsection creating an entitlement to the line of
duty death benefits shall apply exclusively to this section and shall not
be interpreted or otherwise construed to create either an express or
implied presumption of work-relatedness for any type of claim filed
pursuant to KRS Chapter 342.
2. This paragraph is intended to provide clarification regarding the sole and
exclusive application of this subsection to only the benefits available
under this section and shall not be used as a bar or other type of
limitation to impair or alter the rights and ability of a claimant to prove
work-relatedness under KRS Chapter 342 or other laws.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 2/5/2025 12:32 PM Jacketed